Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-703
Affordable Housing Trust Fund; created; use.

(1) The Affordable Housing Trust Fund is created. The fund shall receive money pursuant to section 76-903 and may include appropriations from the Legislature, transfers authorized by the Legislature, grants, private contributions, repayment of loans, and funds from all other sources. The Department of Economic Development as part of its comprehensive housing affordability strategy shall administer the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.

(2)(a) Prior to July 1, 2027, transfers may be made from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to the General Fund, the Behavioral Health Services Fund, the Middle Income Workforce Housing Investment Fund, the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund, and the Site and Building Development Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

(b) Beginning on and after July 1, 2027, money shall not be transferred from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 864, § 9;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 100;

Laws 2005, LB 40, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB388, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 6;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 24;

Laws 2013, LB214, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB518, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB945, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB86, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 40;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1067, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 149.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB768, section 5, with LB1067, section 1, and LB1072, section 149, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB768 and LB1067 became effective July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1072 became operative April 8, 2026.